Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 3 Execution and Attestation

Law reviews.

For article suggesting that nuncupative wills should no longer be recognized in Georgia, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (2009).

53-4-20.
Required writing; signing; witnesses; codicil.

A will shall be in writing and shall be signed by the testator or by some other individual in the testator’s presence and at the testator’s express direction. A testator may sign by mark or by any name that is intended to authenticate the instrument as the testator’s will.

A will shall be attested and subscribed in the presence of the testator by two or more competent witnesses. A witness to a will may attest by mark. Another individual may not subscribe the name of a witness, even in that witness’s presence and at that witness’s direction.

A codicil shall be executed by the testator and attested and subscribed by witnesses with the same formality as a will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Execution of writings and contracts, §

1-3-10

.

Editor’s notes.

The general provisions concerning the competency of witnesses, referred to in the Comment, are now found at
O.C.G.A. §

24-6-601

.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.09.20.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article analyzing execution and attestation requirements in Georgia and advocating certain reforms, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

For article advocating abolition of the prohibition against proxy signatures and repeal of this Code section as unnecessary, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

For article surveying developments in Georgia wills, trusts, and administration of estates law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 307 (1981).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2007).

For comment on the constitutionality of Ga. L. 1958, p. 657; as amended by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess, p. 16, reducing the number of required witnesses to a will to two, in light of the constitutional provision that no law shall refer to more than one subject matter, see 1 Ga. St. B.J. 126 (1964).

53-4-21.
Knowledge of contents of will by testator.

Knowledge of the contents of a will by the testator is necessary to the validity of a will. If the testator can read, the testator’s signature or acknowledgment of that signature is presumed to show such knowledge.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-22.
Competency of witness.

Any individual who is competent to be a witness and age 14 or over may witness a will.

If a witness is competent at the time of attesting the will, the subsequent incompetence of the witness shall not prevent the probate of the will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Competency of witnesses generally, §

24-6-601

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

The general provisions concerning the competency of witnesses, referred to in the Comment, are now found at O.C.G.A. §

24-6-601

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Execution, Revocation and Revalidation of Wills: A Critique of Existing Statutory Formalities,” see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

53-4-23.
Testamentary gift to witness or witness’s spouse.

If a subscribing witness is also a beneficiary under the will, the witness shall be competent; but the testamentary gift to the witness shall be void unless there are at least two other subscribing witnesses to the will who are not beneficiaries under the will.

An individual may be a witness to a will by which a testamentary gift is given to that individual’s spouse, the fact going only to the credibility of the witness.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Competency of witnesses generally, §

24-6-601

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article discussing competency requirement for witnesses to a will in Georgia, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

53-4-24.
Self-proved will or codicil.

At the time of its execution or at any subsequent date during the lifetime of the testator and the witnesses, a will or codicil may be made self-proved and the testimony of the witnesses in the probate regarding such will may be made unnecessary by the affidavits of the testator and the attesting witnesses made before a notary public. The affidavit and certificate provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be the only prerequisites of a self-proved will or codicil.

The affidavit shall be evidenced by a certificate, affixed with the official seal of the notary public, that is attached or annexed to the will or codicil, in form and content substantially as follows:

Click to view

A self-proved will or codicil may be admitted to probate without the testimony of any subscribing witness, but otherwise it shall be treated no differently from a will or codicil that is not self-proved. In particular, without limiting the generality of the foregoing sentence, a self-proved will or codicil may be contested, revoked, or amended in exactly the same fashion as a will or codicil that is not self-proved.

STATE OF GEORGIA COUNTY of Before me, the undersigned authority, on this day personally appeared
,
, and
, known to me to be the testator and the witnesses, respectively, whose names are subscribed to the annexed or foregoing instrument in their respective capacities, and all of said individuals being by me duly sworn,
, testator, declared to me and to the witnesses in my presence that said instrument is the last will and testament or a codicil to the last will and testament of the testator and that the testator had willingly made and executed it as a free act and deed for the purposes expressed therein. The witnesses, each on oath, stated to me in the presence and hearing of the testator that the testator had declared to them that the instrument is the testator’s last will and testament or a codicil to the testator’s last will and testament and that the testator executed the instrument as such and wished each of them to sign it as a witness; and under oath each witness stated further that the witness had signed the same as witness in the presence of the testator and at the testator’s request; that the testator was 14 years of age or over and of sound mind; and that each of the witnesses was then at least 14 years of age. Testator Witness Witness Sworn to and subscribed before me by
, testator, and sworn to and subscribed before me by and
, witnesses, this day of
,
. (SEAL) (Signed)
(Official Capacity of Officer)

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 53.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).